Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-241 Venue in certain actions.
An insured may bring a civil action against the insured's insurer in the state
judicial circuit in which the insured resides or where the insured has its
principal place of business provided the insured purchased the policy within
the State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next